src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_I_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - stʼi - ENGLISH : # CLASS_I

     stʼi+V+Sg+Impv: stʼi
     stʼi+V+Imm+Pres: stʼiga
     stʼi+V+Interr+Simp+Pres: stʼi
     stʼi+V+Simp+Pres: stʼigáng
     stʼi+V+Dir+Past: stʼigán
     stʼi+V+Interr+Past: stʼigáa
     stʼi+V+Indir+Past: stʼigáan
     stʼi+V+Rel: stʼis
     stʼi+V+Rel+Evid: stʼigáas
     stʼi+V+NonFact: stʼiáng
     stʼi+V+Past+NonFact: stʼigáa.ang
     stʼi+V+Interr+Pres+Hab: stʼigáng
     stʼi+V+Pres+Hab: stʼigánggang
     stʼi+V+Pres+Hab+NonFact: stʼigángang
     stʼi+V+Dir+Past+Hab: stʼigáinii
     stʼi+V+Interr+Past+Hab: stʼigáangaa
     stʼi+V+Indir+Past+Hab: stʼigáangaan
     stʼi+V+Interr+Fut+Long: stʼiäsáa
     stʼi+V+Interr+Fut+Short: stʼiäs
     stʼi+V+Simp+Fut: stʼiäsáang
     stʼi+V+Imm+Fut: stʼiäsga
     stʼi+V+Rel+Fut: stʼiäsáas
     stʼi+V+Fut+NonFact: stʼiäsáa.ang
     stʼi+V+Interr+Near+Fut: stʼiáng k̲asaʼáa
     stʼi+V+Near+Fut: stʼiáng k̲asaʼáang
     stʼi+V+Interr+VNear+Fut: stʼiáng k̲asaasdláa
     stʼi+V+VNear+Fut: stʼiáng k̲asaasdláang
     stʼi+V+Bias+Imm+Pres: stʼiʼúuj
     stʼi+V+Bias+Simp+Pres: stʼiʼúujang
     stʼi+V+Res: stʼiäsáaʼuujang
     stʼi+V+Bias+Interr+Pres: stʼiʼus
     stʼi+V+Bias+Interr+Past: stʼiʼujáa
     stʼi+V+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: stʼiʼúujaangaa
     stʼi+V+Bias+Interr+Fut: stʼiäsáaʼus
     stʼi+V+Cert+Pres: stʼiʼahlánggang
     stʼi+V+Cert+Past: stʼiʼahlánggan
     stʼi+V+Cert+Past+Hab: stʼiʼahlánggiinii
     stʼi+V+Cert+Fut: stʼiäsáaʼahlans
     stʼi+V+Cert+Rel: stʼiʼahláns
     stʼi+V+Ints+Past: stʼigáaʼahlang
     stʼi+V+Cont: stʼigáaʼahlanggaa
     stʼi+V+Ctfact+Pres: stʼigáaʼahlanggang
     stʼi+V+Rflx: stʼiʼahl
     stʼi+V+Fut+Rflx+Interr: stʼiäséehl
     stʼi+V+Pl+Impv: stʼiʼúu
     stʼi+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: stʼiʼwáa
     stʼi+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: stʼiʼwáa
     stʼi+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: stʼiʼwáang
     stʼi+V+3pl+Dir+Past: stʼiʼwägán
     stʼi+V+3pl+Interr+Past: stʼiʼáawaa
     stʼi+V+3pl+Indir+Past: stʼiʼáawaan
     stʼi+V+3pl+Rel: stʼiʼwáas
     stʼi+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: stʼiʼáawaas
     stʼi+V+3pl+NonFact: stʼiʼwáa.ang
     stʼi+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: stʼiʼáawaa.ang
     stʼi+V+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: stʼigángʼwaa
     stʼi+V+3pl+Pres+Hab: stʼigángʼwaang
     stʼi+V+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: stʼigángʼwaa.ang
     stʼi+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: stʼiʼwägíinii
     stʼi+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: stʼiʼwägáangaa
     stʼi+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: stʼiʼwägáangaan
     stʼi+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: stʼiʼwáaäsaa
     stʼi+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: stʼiʼwáaäs
     stʼi+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: stʼiʼwáaäsaang
     stʼi+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: stʼiʼwáaäsga
     stʼi+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: stʼiʼwáaäsaas
     stʼi+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: stʼiʼwáaäsaa.ang
     stʼi+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: stʼiʼwáa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     stʼi+V+3pl+Near+Fut: stʼiʼwáa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     stʼi+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: stʼiʼwáa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     stʼi+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: stʼiʼwáa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     stʼi+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: stʼiʼwáaʼuuj
     stʼi+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: stʼiʼwáaʼuujang
     stʼi+V+3pl+Res: stʼiʼwáaäsaaʼuujang
     stʼi+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: stʼiʼwáaʼus
     stʼi+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: stʼiʼwáaʼujaa
     stʼi+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: stʼiʼwáaʼuujaangaa
     stʼi+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: stʼiʼwáaäsaaʼus
     stʼi+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: stʼiʼwáaʼahlanggang
     stʼi+V+3pl+Cert+Past: stʼiʼwáaʼahlanggan
     stʼi+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: stʼiʼwáaʼahlanggiinii
     stʼi+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: stʼiʼwáaäsaaʼahlans
     stʼi+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: stʼiʼwáaʼahlans
     stʼi+V+3pl+Ints+Past: stʼiʼáawaaʼahlang
     stʼi+V+3pl+Cont: stʼiʼáawaaʼahlanggaa
     stʼi+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: stʼiʼáawaaʼahlanggang
     stʼi+V+3pl+Rflx: stʼiʼwáaʼahl
     stʼi+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: stʼiʼwáaäseehl
     stʼi+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: stʼiʼáng
     stʼi+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: stʼiʼángga
     stʼi+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: stʼiʼáng
     stʼi+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: stʼiʼánggang
     stʼi+V+Neg+Dir+Past: stʼiʼánggan
     stʼi+V+Neg+Interr+Past: stʼiʼáangaa
     stʼi+V+Neg+Indir+Past: stʼiʼáangaan
     stʼi+V+Neg+Rel: stʼiʼáns
     stʼi+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: stʼiʼáangaas
     stʼi+V+Neg+NonFact: stʼiʼangáng
     stʼi+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: stʼiʼáangaa.ang
     stʼi+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: stʼiʼánggang
     stʼi+V+Neg+Pres+Hab: stʼigángʼanggang
     stʼi+V+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact: stʼigángʼangang
     stʼi+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: stʼiʼánggiinii
     stʼi+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: stʼiʼánggaangaa
     stʼi+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: stʼiʼánggaangaan
     stʼi+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: stʼiʼángäsaa
     stʼi+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: stʼiʼángäs
     stʼi+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: stʼiʼángäsaang
     stʼi+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: stʼiʼángäsga
     stʼi+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: stʼiʼángäsaas
     stʼi+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: stʼiʼángäsaa.ang
     stʼi+V+Neg+Interr+Near+Fut: stʼiáng k̲asaaʼáng
     stʼi+V+Neg+Near+Fut: stʼiáng k̲asaaʼánggang
     stʼi+V+Neg+Interr+VNear+Fut: stʼiáng k̲asaasdläʼáng
     stʼi+V+Neg+VNear+Fut: stʼiáng k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     stʼi+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: stʼiʼángʼuuj
     stʼi+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: stʼiʼángʼuujang
     stʼi+V+Neg+Res: stʼiʼángäsaaʼuujang
     stʼi+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: stʼiʼángʼus
     stʼi+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: stʼiʼángʼujaa
     stʼi+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: stʼiʼángʼuujaangaa
     stʼi+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: stʼiʼángäsaaʼus
     stʼi+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: stʼiʼáangʼahlanggang
     stʼi+V+Neg+Cert+Past: stʼiʼáangʼahlanggan
     stʼi+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: stʼiʼáangʼahlanggiinii
     stʼi+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: stʼiʼángäsaaʼahlans
     stʼi+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: stʼiʼáangʼahlans
     stʼi+V+Neg+Ints+Past: stʼiʼáangaaʼahlang
     stʼi+V+Neg+Cont: stʼiʼáangaaʼahlanggaa
     stʼi+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: stʼiʼáangaaʼahlanggang
     stʼi+V+Neg+Rflx: stʼiʼáangʼahl
     stʼi+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: stʼiʼángäseehl
     stʼi+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: stʼiʼángʼuu
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: stʼiʼángʼwaa
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: stʼiʼángʼwaa
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: stʼiʼángʼwaang
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: stʼiʼángʼwägan
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: stʼiʼángʼaawaa
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: stʼiʼángʼaawaan
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: stʼiʼángʼwaas
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: stʼiʼángʼaawaas
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: stʼiʼángʼwaa.ang
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: stʼiʼángʼaawaa.ang
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: stʼigángʼangʼwaa
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab: stʼigángʼangʼwaang
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: stʼigángʼangʼwaa.ang
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: stʼiʼángʼwägiinii
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: stʼiʼángʼwägaangaa
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: stʼiʼángʼwägaangaan
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: stʼiʼángʼwaaäsaa
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: stʼiʼángʼwaaäs
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: stʼiʼángʼwaaäsaang
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: stʼiʼángʼwaaäsga
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: stʼiʼángʼwaaäsaas
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: stʼiʼángʼwaaäsaa.ang
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: stʼiʼwáa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: stʼiʼwáa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: stʼiʼwáa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: stʼiʼwáa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: stʼiʼángʼwaaʼuuj
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: stʼiʼángʼwaaʼuujang
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Res: stʼiʼángʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: stʼiʼángʼwaaʼus
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: stʼiʼángʼwaaʼujaa
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: stʼiʼángʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: stʼiʼángʼwaaäsaaʼus
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: stʼiʼángʼwaaʼahlanggang
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: stʼiʼángʼwaaʼahlanggan
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: stʼiʼángʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: stʼiʼángʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: stʼiʼángʼwaaʼahlans
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: stʼiʼángʼaawaaʼahlang
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: stʼiʼángʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: stʼiʼángʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: stʼiʼángʼwaaʼahl
     stʼi+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: stʼiʼángʼwaaäseehl
